Illinois, session 104th, HB521.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Workplace Violence Prevention Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 275/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Workplace Violence Prevention Act.9(Source: P.A. 98-430, eff. 1-1-14.)